Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2778.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6614HV (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 2778 Section 1. Section 422.12, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. âEmergency medical services personnel memberâ means an 3 emergency medical care provider, as defined in section 147A.1 , 4 who is certified as a first responder pursuant to chapter 147A , 5 or who is a volunteer ambulance driver . 6 Sec. 2. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 7 retroactively to January 1, 2026, for tax years beginning on 8 or after that date. 9